Alabama, session 2026rs, HB341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
11 Section 1. Section 40-18-19, Code of Alabama 1975, is
12 amended to read as follows:
13 "§40-18-19
14 (a) The following exemptions from income taxation shall
15 be allowed to every individual resident taxpayer:
16 (1) Retirement allowances, pensions and annuities, or
17 optional allowances, approved by the Board of Control of the
18 Teachers' Retirement System of Alabama, which exempt status is
19 set out in Section 16-25-23.
20 (2) Retirement allowances, pensions and annuities, or
21 optional allowances, approved by the Board of Control of the
22 Employees' Retirement System of Alabama, which exempt status
23 is set out in Section 36-27-28.
24 (3) The first eight thousand dollars ($8,000) of any
25 retirement compensation, retirement allowances, pensions and
26 annuities, or optional allowances, received by any eligible
27 firefighter, as defined in Sections 36-32-1 and 36-32-2, or
28 his or her designated beneficiary, from any firefighting
Page 1

his or her designated beneficiary, from any firefighting
HB341 Enrolled
29 agency established in the State of Alabama, but only if such
30 retirement compensation, retirement allowances, pensions and
31 annuities, or optional allowances as are awarded as a result
32 of fire protection services rendered. This subdivision shall
33 become effective for the taxable years beginning January 1,
34 1987, and thereafter following its passage and approval by the
35 Governor, or upon its otherwise becoming a law; provided, that
36 for the taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1991,
37 all of the pension and retirement payments shall be exempt
38 from taxation.
39 (4) The first eight thousand dollars ($8,000) of any
40 retirement compensation, retirement allowances, pensions and
41 annuities, or optional allowances received by any eligible
42 peace officer, as defined in subdivision (11) of Section
43 36-21-60(11), or his or her designated beneficiary, from any
44 police retirement system established in the State of Alabama,
45 but only if the retirement compensation, retirement
46 allowances, pensions and annuities, or optional allowances are
47 awarded as a result of police services rendered. This
48 subdivision shall become effective for taxable years beginning
49 January 1, 1984, and thereafter; provided, that for the
50 taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1991, all of
51 the pension and retirement payments shall be exempt from
52 taxation.
53 (5) Income received as annuities under the United
54 States Retirement System from the United States Government
55 Civil Service Retirement and Disability Fund, including income
56 received from the Tennessee Valley Authority's pension system,
Page 2

received from the Tennessee Valley Authority's pension system,
HB341 Enrolled
57 income received as annuities under the United States Foreign
58 Service Retirement and Disability Fund, or income received
59 from any other United States government retirement and
60 disability fund.
61 (6) Beginning January 1, 1991, all payments made on or
62 after such date to a retiree or his designated beneficiary
63 under a "defined benefit plan," as defined under 26 U.S.C. §
64 414(j), to the extent such payment would be taxable for
65 federal income tax purposes.
66 (7) Net income realized by individuals and partnerships
67 from time to time in the business of conducting a financial
68 business employing monied capital coming into competition with
69 the business of national banks, but only if such individuals
70 and partnerships are subject to an excise tax imposed by this
71 state on or with respect to such income.
72 (8) In the case of a single person or a married person
73 not living with husband or wife, a personal exemption of one
74 thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or, in the case of a
75 head of a family or a married person living with husband or
76 wife, a personal exemption of three thousand dollars ($3,000),
77 but a husband and wife living together shall receive only one
78 personal exemption of three thousand dollars ($3,000) against
79 their aggregate income, and in case they make separate returns
80 each must claim a personal exemption of one thousand five
81 hundred dollars ($1,500).
82 (9) a. Three hundred dollars ($300) for each person,
83 other than husband or wife, dependent upon the taxpayer, and
84 over half of whose support, for the calendar year in which the
Page 3

over half of whose support, for the calendar year in which the
HB341 Enrolled
85 taxable year for the taxpayer begins, was received from the
86 taxpayer.
87 b. For tax years beginning after December 31, 2006, for
88 taxpayers with adjusted gross income equal to or less than
89 twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), one thousand dollars
90 ($1,000) for each person other than husband or wife, dependent
91 upon the taxpayer, and over half of whose support, for the
92 calendar year in which the taxable year for the taxpayer
93 begins, was received from the taxpayer.
94 c. For tax years beginning after December 31, 2006, for
95 taxpayers with adjusted gross income in excess of twenty
96 thousand dollars ($20,000) and equal to or less than one
97 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), five hundred dollars
98 ($500) for each person other than husband and wife, dependent
99 upon the taxpayer, and over half of whose support, for the
100 calendar year in which the taxable year for the taxpayer
101 begins, was received from the taxpayer.
102 d. For tax years beginning after December 31, 2021, for
103 taxpayers with adjusted gross income equal to or less than
104 fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), one thousand dollars
105 ($1,000) for each person other than husband or wife, dependent
106 upon the taxpayer, and over half of whose support, for the
107 calendar year in which the taxable year for the taxpayer
108 begins, was received from the taxpayer.
109 e. For tax years beginning after December 31, 2021, for
110 taxpayers with adjusted gross income in excess of fifty
111 thousand dollars ($50,000) and equal to or less than one
112 hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), five hundred dollars
Page 4

hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), five hundred dollars
HB341 Enrolled
113 ($500) for each person other than husband and wife, dependent
114 upon the taxpayer, and over half of whose support, for the
115 calendar year in which the taxable year for the taxpayer
116 begins, was received from the taxpayer.
117 For the purposes of this section, "dependent" shall
118 mean: A son or daughter of the taxpayer or a descendant of
119 either; a stepson or stepdaughter of the taxpayer; a brother,
120 sister, stepbrother, or stepsister of the taxpayer; the father
121 or mother of the taxpayer or an ancestor of either; a
122 stepfather or stepmother of the taxpayer; a son or daughter of
123 a brother or sister of the taxpayer; a brother or sister of
124 the father or mother of the taxpayer; or a son-in-law,
125 daughter-in-law, father-in-law, mother-in-law, brother-in-law,
126 or sister-in-law of the taxpayer. As used in this paragraph
127 the terms "brother" and "sister" include a brother or sister
128 by the half blood. For the purpose of determining whether any
129 of the foregoing relationships exist, a legally adopted child
130 of a person shall be considered a child of such a person by
131 blood.
132 (10) Beginning January 1, 1998, all income, interest,
133 dividends, gains, or benefits of any kind received from
134 savings accounts or prepaid tuition contracts administered
135 under Title 16, Chapter 33C, are exempt from all income
136 taxation by the state and by all of its political subdivisions
137 to the extent that the amounts remain on deposit in the PACT
138 Trust Fund or the ACES Trust Fund, or are used to pay the
139 designated beneficiary's qualified higher education expenses
140 as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 529, or are refunded under such
Page 5

as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 529, or are refunded under such
HB341 Enrolled
141 terms as would not carry a penalty under 26 U.S.C. § 529.
142 (11) Beginning January 1, 2016, all income, interest,
143 dividends, gains, or benefits of any kind received from ABLE
144 savings accounts administered under Title 16, Chapter 33C, are
145 exempt from all income taxation by the state and by all of its
146 political subdivisions to the extent that the amounts remain
147 on deposit in the ABLE Trust Fund, or are used to pay the
148 designated beneficiary's qualified disability expenses as
149 defined in 26 U.S.C. § 529A, or are refunded under such terms
150 as would not carry a penalty under 26 U.S.C. § 529A, or other
151 applicable federal law.
152 (12) Beginning January 1, 2018, amounts received by an
153 individual from sources within a foreign country or countries
154 which constitute a housing allowance, and earned income
155 attributable to services performed by such individual received
156 during the tax period are exempt from all income taxation by
157 the state and by all of its political subdivisions to the
158 extent such income is exempt from federal income tax pursuant
159 to 26 U.S.C. § 911.
160 (13) a. Beginning January 1, 2023, the first six
161 thousand dollars ($6,000) of taxable retirement income.
162 b. This exemption may only be claimed by individual
163 taxpayers who are 65 years of age or older.
164 (14) Beginning January 1, 2027 through December 31,
165 2029, the first five thousand dollars ($5,000) of income
166 received by a member of the Alabama National Guard as payment
167 for inactive duty training (IDT) as described in 37 U.S.C. §
168 206.
Page 6

206.
HB341 Enrolled
169 (b) Of the following personal exemptions allowed
170 resident taxpayers, each nonresident individual taxpayer shall
171 be allowed that proportion thereof that the adjusted gross
172 income received by saidthe nonresident individual taxpayer
173 from sources within the State of Alabama bears to his or her
174 adjusted gross income received from sources within and without
175 the State of Alabama: In the case of a single person or a
176 married person not living with husband or wife, a personal
177 exemption of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or, in
178 the case of a head of a family or a married person living with
179 husband or wife, a personal exemption of three thousand
180 dollars ($3,000), a husband and wife living together shall
181 receive but one personal exemption of three thousand dollars
182 ($3,000) against their aggregate income; and, in case they
183 make separate returns, each must claim a personal exemption of
184 one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500); and the amount in
185 subdivision (a)(9) of subsection (a) for each person, other
186 than husband or wife, dependent upon and receiving his or her
187 chief support from the taxpayer.
188 (c) The Department of Revenue may enact rules as
189 necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this
190 actsection."
191 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
192 1, 2026.
Page 7

1, 2026.
HB341 Enrolled
193
194
195
196
197
198
199 ________________________________________________
200 Speaker of the House of Representatives
201
202
203
204 ________________________________________________
205 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
206
207
208 House of Representatives
209
210 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
211 was passed by the House 10-Feb-26, as amended.
212
213 John Treadwell
214 Clerk
215
216
217
218
219
220 Senate 07-Apr-26 Amended and Passed
221
222 House 07-Apr-26 Concurred in Senate
223 Amendment
224
225
Page 8